Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.010

Divisions of department—Assistant directors—State veterinarian—Salaries—Assignment of duties.

In order to obtain maximum efficiency and effectiveness within the department of agriculture, the director may create such administrative divisions within the department as he or she deems necessary. The director shall appoint a deputy director as well as such assistant directors as shall be needed to administer the several divisions within the department. The director shall appoint no more than eight assistant directors. The officers appointed under this section are exempt from the provisions of the state civil service law as provided in RCW 41.06.070(1)(g), and shall be paid salaries to be fixed by the governor in accordance with the procedure established by law for the fixing of salaries for officers exempt from the operation of the state civil service law. The director shall also appoint and deputize a state veterinarian who shall be an experienced veterinarian properly licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state.

The director of agriculture shall have charge and general supervision of the department and may assign supervisory and administrative duties other than those specified in RCW 43.23.070 to the division which in his or her judgment can most efficiently carry on those functions.

[ 2002 c 354 s 244; 1990 c 37 s 1; 1983 c 248 s 3; 1967 c 240 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.23.010. Prior: 1951 c 170 s 1; 1921 c 7 s 83; RRS s 10841.]

NOTES:

Short title—2002 c 354: See RCW 41.80.907.

Severability—1967 c 240: "If any provision of this act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1967 c 240 s 52.]

Apiary advisory committee: RCW 15.60.010.